Idaho, session 2025, S1046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1637, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1637. HUMAN GROWTH AND DEVELOPMENT INSTRUCTION IN PUBLIC
SCHOOLS. (1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each school district,
specially chartered district, and public charter school serving students
in grades 5 through 12 inclusive, or any combination thereof, shall include
instruction on human growth and development as provided in this subsection
and subsection (2) of this section. Such instruction shall include but shall
not be limited to an age appropriate presentation of:
(a) A high-definition ultrasound video, at least three (3) minutes in
duration, showing the development of the brain, heart, sex organs, and
other vital organs in early fetal development; and
(b) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation showing
the process of fertilization and every stage of human development in-
side the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ de-
velopment for every week of pregnancy until birth.
(2) The instruction required in subsection (1) of this section shall
also be included in every class that discusses or provides instruction con-
cerning human biology, discusses or provides instruction concerning contra-
ception, or discusses or provides instruction concerning sexually transmit-
ted diseases or sexually transmitted infections.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.